Florida, session 2026, SB1184.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 8 9 Section 1.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (8) of 10 section 193.155, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 11 193.155âHomestead assessments.âHomestead property shall be 12 assessed at just value as of January 1, 1994. Property receiving 13 the homestead exemption after January 1, 1994, shall be assessed 14 at just value as of January 1 of the year in which the property 15 receives the exemption unless the provisions of subsection (8) 16 apply. 17 (8)âProperty assessed under this section shall be assessed 18 at less than just value when the person who establishes a new 19 homestead has received a homestead exemption as of January 1 of 20 any of the 3 immediately preceding years. For purposes of this 21 subsection, a husband and wife who owned and both permanently 22 resided on a previous homestead shall each be considered to have 23 received the homestead exemption even though only the husband or 24 the wife applied for the homestead exemption on the previous 25 homestead. The assessed value of the newly established homestead 26 shall be determined as provided in this subsection. 27 (a)âIf the just value of the new homestead as of January 1 28 is greater than or equal to the just value of the immediate 29 prior homestead as of January 1 of the year in which the 30 immediate prior homestead was abandoned, the assessed value of 31 the new homestead shall be the just value of the new homestead 32 minus an amount equal to the lesser of $500,000 or the 33 difference between the just value and the assessed value of the 34 immediate prior homestead as of January 1 of the year in which 35 the prior homestead was abandoned. Thereafter, the homestead 36 shall be assessed as provided in this section. 37 (b)âIf the just value of the new homestead as of January 1 38 is less than the just value of the immediate prior homestead as 39 of January 1 of the year in which the immediate prior homestead 40 was abandoned, the assessed value of the new homestead shall be 41 equal to the just value of the new homestead divided by the just 42 value of the immediate prior homestead and multiplied by the 43 assessed value of the immediate prior homestead. However, if the 44 difference between the just value of the new homestead and the 45 assessed value of the new homestead calculated pursuant to this 46 paragraph is greater than $500,000, the assessed value of the 47 new homestead shall be increased so that the difference between 48 the just value and the assessed value equals $500,000. 49 Thereafter, the homestead shall be assessed as provided in this 50 section. 51 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.